lexd/lez_pro.lexd
PATTERN Pronoun
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You1) [<prn>:] [>] ProAbs)[^[NonBack,Back]] ([>] Add)?
ProperPersonalPronounsErg ([>] Add)?
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You1) [<prn>:] [>] ProGen)[^[NonBack,Back]] ([>] Add)?
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You2) [<prn>:] ProErgObl [>] ProDat)[^[NonBack,Back]] ([>] Add)?
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You2) ProErgObl [<prn>:] [>] InflEssive ([<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative))))[^[NonBack,Back]] ([>] Add)?
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You2) ProErgObl [<prn>:] [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative)))[^[NonBack,Back]] ([>] Add)?
ReflPron [<prn>:] 
ReflPronObl [<prn>:] [<erg>:] 
ReflPronObl [<prn>:] [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
ReflPronObl [<prn>:] [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
Demonstrative [<prn>:]
Demonstrative [<prn>:] [>] DemonstrativeAbs
Demonstrative [<prn>:] [>] AdjObl [<erg>:]
Demonstrative [<prn>:] [>] AdjObl [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
Demonstrative [<prn>:] [>] AdjObl [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
Interrogative [<prn>:]
InterrogativeNoInfl [<prn>:] ([>] Add)?
InterrogativeObl [<prn>:] ([<erg>:] | ([>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))))
InterrogativeObl [<prn>:] [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
NegativeNonInfl [<prn>:]
NegativeObl(1) [<prn>:] [<erg>:] 
NegativeObl(1) [<prn>:] [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative))))) [>] NegativeObl(2)
NegativeObl(1) [<prn>:] [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative)) [>] NegativeObl(2)
Quantifier [<prn>:] 

LEXICON ProperPersonalPronouns
з[Back] # я
в[Back] # ты
ч[Back] # мы

LEXICON PersonalPronoun_You1
к[NonBack] # вы

LEXICON PersonalPronoun_You2
кв[NonBack] # вы

LEXICON ProAbs
<abs>:ун[Back]
<abs>:уьн[NonBack]

LEXICON ProperPersonalPronounsErg
з<prn>><erg>:з>а # я
в<prn>><erg>:вун>а # ты
ч<prn>><erg>:чн>а # мы
к<prn>><erg>:куьн>е # вы

LEXICON ProErgObl
:а[Back]
:е[NonBack]

LEXICON ProGen
<gen>:и[Back]
<gen>:уь[NonBack]

LEXICON ProDat
<dat>:з

LEXICON ReflPron
жув # сам (1, 2 лицо)
вич # сам (3 лицо ед.ч)
чеб # сами (3лицо мн.ч.)

LEXICON ReflPronObl
жув:жува
вич:вичи
чеб:чпи

LEXICON Demonstrative
и # this
а # that
атӀа # yonder
гьа # the aforementioned
вини # that up there
агъа # that down there

LEXICON DemonstrativeAbs
<sg><abs>:м
<pl><abs>:бур

LEXICON Interrogative
вуж # кто
вуч # что
гьи # который

LEXICON InterrogativeNoInfl
мус # когда
шумуд # как много
вучиз # почему

LEXICON InterrogativeObl
вуж:ни
вуч:куь
гьи:хи

LEXICON NegativeNonInfl
касни # никто
затӀни # ничто
садни # ни один, никто

LEXICON NegativeObl(2)
сада ни # никто
куьни ни # ничто

LEXICON Quantifier
вири # все 
гьар # каждый
муькуь # другой из двух
